test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kid_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - кид: # Noun 'a hand'
     кид+N+Sg+Nom: кид
     кид+N+Sg+Gen: кидӹн
     кид+N+Sg+Acc: кидӹм
     кид+N+Sg+Com: кидге
     кид+N+Sg+Dat: кидлӓн
     кид+N+Sg+Ine: кидӹштӹ
     кид+N+Sg+Ill: [кидӹш, кидӹшкӹ]
     кид+N+Sg+Lat: кидеш
     кид+N+Sg+Cmpr: кидлӓ
     кид+N+Sg+Abe: кидде

     кид+N+Pl+Nom: кидвлӓ

     кид+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: кидем
     кид+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: кидет
     кид+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: кидшӹ
     кид+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: киднӓ
     кид+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: киддӓ
     кид+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: кидӹштӹ
